Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-551
Intergovernmental data services program; created.

The intergovernmental data services program is created and shall be located within the information management services division of the office of Chief Information Officer.

Laws 1993, LB 543, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 31;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 81-1120.35;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 321;

Laws 2006, LB 921, § 21.